apertium-tg-fa/apertium-tg-en.tg.dix.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="utf-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>АБВГДЕЁЖЗИЙКЛМНОПРСТУФХЧШЪЭЮЯҒӢҚӮҲҶабвгдеёжзийклмнопрстуфхчшъэюяғӣқӯҳҷ</alphabet>
  <xi:include xmlns:xi="http://www.w3.org/2001/XInclude" href="apertium-tg-en.symbols.xml"/>

  <pardefs>

    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>,</l>
         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>'</l>
         <r>'<s n="apos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Numbers -->
    <pardef n="як__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ду__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Enclitics -->

    <pardef n="izafet__enc">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r/>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
	  <r><j/>izafet<s n="enc"/><s n="iza"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>-и</l>
	  <r><j/>izafet<s n="enc"/><s n="iza"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="directobject__enc">
      <e>
	<p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="enc"/><s n="dom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pronominal__enc">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ат</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>аш</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>амон</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>атон</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ашон</l>
          <r>prenc<s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Pronouns -->

    <pardef n="prsubj__prn">
      <e>
	<p>
          <l>ман</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>
          <l>ту</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>
          <l>ӯ</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>
          <l>вай</l> <!-- him or her -->
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>
          <l>мо</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>
          <l>шумо</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>
          <l>онҳо</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Relative pronouns -->

    <pardef n="ки__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Determiners -->

    <pardef n="ин__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <!-- Proper Nouns -->

    <pardef n="Тоҷикистон__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Nouns -->

    <pardef n="китоб__n">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ҳо</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ҳое</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ҷамоҳир__n"> 			<!-- Arabic broken plurals -->
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="духтар__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>он</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>оне</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Adjectives -->

    <pardef n="бузург__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тар</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тарин</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="русӣ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="хушрӯ/й__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>й</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тар</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тарин</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Adverbs -->

    <pardef n="имрӯз__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Prepositions -->

    <pardef n="дар__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="pr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="ва__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="барои__cnjadv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Verbs -->

    <e lm="ро"><i>ро</i><par n="directobject__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="ро"><i>-ро</i><par n="directobject__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="personal subject pronouns"><i/><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="pronominal enclitic"><i/><par n="pronominal__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="кӣ"><i>кӣ</i><par n="ки__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="як"><i>як</i><par n="як__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ду"><i>ду</i><par n="ду__num"/></e>
    <e lm="Осиё"><i>Осиё</i><par n="Тоҷикистон__np"/><par n="izafet__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="Бангладеш"><i>Бангладеш</i><par n="Тоҷикистон__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Венесуэла"><i>Венесуэла</i><par n="Тоҷикистон__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Иёлоти Муттаҳидаи Амрико"><i>Иёлоти<b/>Муттаҳидаи<b/>Амрико</i><par n="Тоҷикистон__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Кувайт"><i>Кувайт</i><par n="Тоҷикистон__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Малта"><i>Малта</i><par n="Тоҷикистон__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Норвегия"><i>Норвегия</i><par n="Тоҷикистон__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Сиерра Леоне"><i>Сиерра<b/>Леоне</i><par n="Тоҷикистон__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Хорватия"><i>Хорватия</i><par n="Тоҷикистон__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Брашов"><i>Брашов</i><par n="Тоҷикистон__np"/></e>
    <e lm="абр"><i>абр</i><par n="китоб__n"/><par n="izafet__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="ҷав"><i>ҷав</i><par n="китоб__n"/><par n="izafet__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳарф"><i>ҳарф</i><par n="китоб__n"/><par n="izafet__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="акс"><i>акс</i><par n="китоб__n"/><par n="izafet__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="аксбардорак"><i>аксбардорак</i><par n="китоб__n"/><par n="izafet__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="алифбо"><i>алифбо</i><par n="китоб__n"/><par n="izafet__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="банк"><i>банк</i><par n="китоб__n"/></e>
    <e lm="вагон"><i>вагон</i><par n="китоб__n"/></e>
    <e lm="дарё"><i>дарё</i><par n="китоб__n"/></e>
    <e lm="интерфейс"><i>интерфейс</i><par n="китоб__n"/></e>
    <e lm="компютер"><i>компютер</i><par n="китоб__n"/></e>
    <e lm="код"><i>код</i><par n="китоб__n"/><par n="izafet__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="мақола"><i>мақола</i><par n="китоб__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ручка"><i>ручка</i><par n="китоб__n"/></e>
    <e lm="таърих"><i>таърих</i><par n="китоб__n"/><par n="izafet__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="тӯфон"><i>тӯфон</i><par n="китоб__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ҷанг"><i>ҷанг</i><par n="китоб__n"/><par n="izafet__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="ҷамоҳир"><i>ҷамоҳир</i><par n="ҷамоҳир__n"/><par n="izafet__enc"/></e>
    <e lm="амак"><i>амак</i><par n="духтар__n"/></e>
    <e lm="бародар"><i>бародар</i><par n="духтар__n"/></e>
    <e lm="деҳқон"><i>деҳқон</i><par n="духтар__n"/></e>
    <e lm="духтур"><i>духтур</i><par n="духтар__n"/></e>
    <e lm="корбар"><i>корбар</i><par n="духтар__n"/></e>
    <e lm="модар"><i>модар</i><par n="духтар__n"/></e>
    <e lm="президент"><i>президент</i><par n="духтар__n"/></e>
    <e lm="студент"><i>студент</i><par n="духтар__n"/></e>
    <e lm="химик"><i>химик</i><par n="духтар__n"/></e>
    <e lm="аз"><i>аз</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ба"><i>ба</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="бар"><i>бар</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="бе"><i>бе</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="бо"><i>бо</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="дар"><i>дар</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="чун"><i>чун</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="то"><i>то</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ин"><i>ин</i><par n="ин__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ва"><i>ва</i><par n="ва__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ё"><i>ё</i><par n="ва__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="барои"><i>барои</i><par n="барои__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="имрӯз"><i>имрӯз</i><par n="имрӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="баланд"><i>баланд</i><par n="бузург__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="беш"><i>беш</i><par n="бузург__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="бузург"><i>бузург</i><par n="бузург__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="дур"><i>дур</i><par n="бузург__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="зебо"><i>зебо</i><par n="бузург__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="калон"><i>калон</i><par n="бузург__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="нав"><i>нав</i><par n="бузург__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="озод"><i>озод</i><par n="бузург__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="шавқовар"><i>шавқовар</i><par n="бузург__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="хушрӯй"><i>хушрӯ</i><par n="хушрӯ/й__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="русӣ"><i>русӣ</i><par n="русӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="шӯравӣ"><i>шӯравӣ</i><par n="русӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="тоҷикӣ"><i>тоҷикӣ</i><par n="русӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="руминӣ"><i>руминӣ</i><par n="русӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="аслӣ"><i>аслӣ</i><par n="русӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="марказӣ"><i>марказӣ</i><par n="русӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="қадимӣ"><i>қадимӣ</i><par n="русӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e>
      <par n="separa"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="numeros"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="coma"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="cometa"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="paresq"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="pardret"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="guionet"/>
    </e>
